District of Columbia statutes.
42-305

Title conveyable by anyone claiming such.

Any person claiming title to land may convey his interest in the same, notwithstanding there may be an adverse possession thereof.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1269, ch. 854, § 513
Severance of joint tenancies: This section and § 42-301 do not supersede the common law rule authorizing the unilateral severance of joint tenancies. Estate of Gulledge, App. D.C., 673 A.2d 1278 (1996).
1973 Ed., § 45-105.
1981 Ed., § 45-305.